Hawaii statutes.
§323D-18.5 Access to health and dental
insurance data; mandatory reporting for certain insurers; uses;
confidentiality. (a) Providers of health insurance doing business in the
State and who are not subject to subsection (b) may submit to the state agency
or its designee, upon request of the state agency, administrative data that the
state agency deems necessary to perform its functions.

(b) Beginning November 1, 2016, providers of
health insurance that provide health [benefits] plans funded by the Hawaii
employer-union health benefits trust fund, the state medicaid agency, or both,
shall provide to the state agency, or its designee, administrative data
required by the state agency to determine health benefits costs, including
health care services claims and payment data regarding beneficiaries of health
benefits plans funded by the Hawaii employer-union health benefits trust fund,
the state medicaid agency, or both.

(c) The state agency shall submit data
collected pursuant to this section to the college of social sciences, social
sciences research institute, Pacific health informatics and data center at the
University of Hawaii for processing, assignment of encrypted identifiers, and
any other task deemed necessary by the state agency. After July 1, 2018, the
state agency may designate another data center to which to submit the data
obtained pursuant to this section; provided that the data center is established
under and meets the conflict of interest requirements of 42 United States Code
section 300gg-94. The state agency may contract with entities for the analysis
of data collected under this section and processed by a data center pursuant to
this subsection to benefit medicaid and medicare recipients, public employees,
and public sector retirees and for other public purposes.

(d) The state agency shall develop and update
an annual plan for the analysis, maintenance, and publication of data collected
pursuant to this section. The state agency shall seek approval for the annual
plan from the director of health, administrator of the MedQuest division of the
department of human services, and the chief information officer of the State.

(e) The state agency shall adopt rules,
pursuant to chapter 91, for the schedule and frequency with which providers of
health insurance shall provide administrative data to the state agency.
Administrative rules shall also include provisions relating to data governance,
data submission, use and sharing, information security, privacy protection,
reporting, and any other matter necessary for the state agency to perform its
functions under this section. In adopting administrative rules, the state
agency shall consider the measures necessary to implement data submission
requirements by providers of health insurance subject to this section, using
methods that are reasonable and cost-effective for data submitters.

(f) The state agency or its designee shall not
disclose any individual patient's personal health information in violation of
state or federal law.

(g) To minimize any risk of data breaches and
re-identification of data, the data and information submitted to the state
agency shall include only the minimum protected health information identifiers
necessary to link public and private data sources and the geographic and
services data to undertake studies.

(h) The state agency or its designee, and any
recipient of data collected pursuant to this section, shall maintain the
original protected health information identifier in a separate database that is
not linked with any other data and shall use a proxy or encrypted record
identifier for data analysis.

(i) Under no circumstances shall a person
attempt to re-identify subjects of protected health information from the data
submitted to the state agency or its designee. No person may disclose data
that contains direct personal identifiers, including but not limited to name,
mailing address, e-mail, telephone number, date of birth, or social security
number.

(j) The state agency or its designee may
acquire federal medicare data sets specific to Hawaii and made available to
states. Any public agency that possesses medicare data sets specific to Hawaii
shall share the data with the state agency or its designee at no additional
cost to the state agency or its designee.

(k) No later than twenty days prior to the
convening of each regular session, the state agency shall submit an annual
report to the legislature on the submission, maintenance, and use of data
submitted to the state agency pursuant to this section.

(l) For the purposes of this section:

"Administrative data" means:

(1) Statistical and financial reports of information;

(2) Patient invoices or similar patient encounter
data;

(3) Records of services used for or resulting from
administering delivery of health care, pharmacy benefits, or dental care,
including records of services provided under health benefits plans as defined
in section 87A-1; and

(4) Any other records as established pursuant to
administrative rules adopted pursuant to chapter 91.

"Provider of health insurance" means
a group health insurance contract or service agreement that may include
medical, hospital, surgical, prescription drug, vision, or dental services, in
which a carrier agrees to provide, pay for, arrange for, or reimburse the cost
of the services, including third party administrators. [L 1987, c 270, pt of §1;
am L 2016, c 139, §2]

Note

Interim rules pertaining to health and dental insurance data
(effective until June 30, 2017, or rules are adopted pursuant to subsection
(e)); reports to 2017-2018 legislature. L 2016, c 139, §§3, 4.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next